Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations of the Department of Transportation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Quasi-Municipal Tort Liability in Georgia,” see 6 Mercer L. Rev. 287 (1955).